Maryland, session 2025, HB1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–838.1.
(a) In this section, “hearing aid” means a device that:
(1) is of a design and circuitry to optimize audibility and listening skills in
the environment commonly experienced by adults; and
(2) is nondisposable.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(2) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or
surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or delivered in
the State.
(c) An entity subject to this section shall provide coverage for all medically
appropriate and necessary hearing aids for an adult who is covered under a policy or
contract if the hearing aids are:
– 1 –

Ch. 742 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) prescribed, fitted, and dispensed by a licensed audiologist; OR
(2) ORDERED, FITTED, AND DISPENSED BY A LICENSED HEARING AID
DISPENSER.
(d) (1) An entity subject to this section may limit the benefit payable under
subsection (c) of this section to $1,400 per hearing aid for each hearing–impaired ear every
36 months.
(2) An insured or enrollee may choose a hearing aid that is priced higher
than the benefit payable under this subsection and may pay the difference between the
price of the hearing aid and the benefit payable under this subsection, without financial or
contractual penalty to the provider of the hearing aid.
(e) This section does not prohibit an entity subject to this section from providing
coverage that is greater or more favorable to an insured or enrollee than the coverage
required under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –